Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Collected moneys” means moneys that  have been collected from an inmate trust
account by the Department of Corrections pursuant to this section.
(b) “Court-ordered financial obligation” means:
(A) A compensatory fine imposed pursuant to ORS  137.101, an award of restitution as
defined in ORS 137.103 or any other fines, fees  or court-appointed attorney fees imposed in
a criminal action;
(B) A child support obligation;
(C) A civil judgment including a money award for a crime victim entered against an  in-
mate resulting from a crime committed by the inmate; or
(D) A civil judgment including a money award entered  against an inmate resulting from
an action for the inmate’s assault or battery of a Department of Corrections or Oregon
Corrections Enterprises employee.
(c) “Eligible moneys” means moneys deposited in an inmate trust  account that are sub-
ject to collection under this section, including but not limited to  inmate performance mone-
tary awards and moneys received from an inmate’s family members or  friends. “Eligible
moneys” does not include protected moneys.
(d) “Inmate” means a person who is at least 18 years of age and  in the physical custody
of the Department of Corrections. “Inmate” does not include:
(A) A  person on leave from prison due to participation in an alternative incarceration
program established under ORS 421.504 or short-term transitional leave under ORS 421.168.
(B) A person transferred into or out of department custody  pursuant to an interstate
corrections compact.
(C) A person in the physical custody of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(D) A person in the physical custody of a county jail or other county detention facility.
(e) “Protected moneys” means moneys deposited in an inmate trust account that are not
subject to  collection under state or federal law or under this section including but not limited
to:
(A) Disability benefits for veterans;
(B) Moneys received from a Native American tribe or tribal government;
(C) Moneys dedicated for medical, dental or optical expenses or emergency trips;
(D) Railroad retirement benefits; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 844 (SB 844-B) Page 1
(E) Moneys paid as compensation to  an inmate in a prison work program established
under the Prison Industries Enhancement Certification Program, or a  successor program
designated by  the United States Director of the Bureau of Justice Assistance pursuant to
18 U.S.C. 1761.
(2)(a) The Department of Corrections shall collect eligible moneys from an  inmate trust
account if the inmate owes court-ordered financial obligations as described in this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of  this section, the department may deduct a
fixed percentage of each  inmate performance monetary award made to an inmate, to be
credited to a general victims assistance fund,  before crediting the remainder of the award
to the inmate trust account.
(3)(a) The Department of Justice and the Judicial Department shall provide an  account-
ing to  the Department of Corrections of court-ordered financial obligations, if any, owed by
each inmate. The accounting records may be provided electronically in a format agreed upon
by the departments.
(b) Upon receipt  of the accounting records described in paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the Department of Corrections shall collect a portion of eligible moneys from the inmate
trust account of each inmate as follows:
(A) Until  an inmate not sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without the possibil-
ity of release or parole has $500 in a transitional fund to facilitate reentry after release,  10
percent of eligible moneys shall be  collected for court-ordered financial obligations and five
percent of eligible moneys shall be collected and transferred to the inmate’s transitional
fund.
(B) After the inmate has at least $500 in the transitional fund,  or if the inmate has been
sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without the possibility of release  or parole, the
department shall collect 15 percent of eligible moneys for court-ordered financial obligations.
(C) After court-ordered financial obligations have been paid,  an inmate not sentenced to
death or to life imprisonment without the  possibility of release or parole may elect to con-
tinue to transfer five percent of eligible moneys into the transitional fund.
(4) There are three levels of priority for the  application of collected moneys to court-
ordered financial obligations, with Level I obligations having the highest  priority and Level
III obligations having the lowest priority. The levels are as follows:
(a) Level I  obligations are compensatory fines imposed pursuant to ORS 137.101, awards
of restitution defined in ORS 137.103 and fines, fees or court-appointed attorney  fees imposed
in a criminal action.
(b) Level II obligations are child support  obligations and civil judgments including a
money award for a crime victim entered against an inmate resulting from a crime committed
by the inmate.
(c) Level III obligations are civil judgments including a money  award entered against an
inmate resulting from an action for the  inmate’s assault or battery of a Department of
Corrections or Oregon Corrections Enterprises employee.
(5)(a) After receiving the accounting records described  in subsection (3) of this section,
the Department of Corrections  shall disburse the collected moneys for court-ordered finan-
cial obligations to the Department of Justice and the Judicial Department.
(b) The Department of  Justice and the Judicial Department shall apply the collected
moneys received from the Department of Corrections under this subsection to  an inmate’s
court-ordered financial obligations according to the priority levels of the obligations.
(6)(a) The Department of Justice may create a subaccount in which to  deposit the col-
lected moneys received from the Department of Corrections under this section.
(b) The Judicial Department may create a subaccount in which to deposit  the collected
moneys received from the Department of Corrections under this section.
(c) The  Department of Corrections may create subaccounts for the purposes of storing
collected moneys prior to disbursement under this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 844 (SB 844-B) Page 2
(7) The Department of Corrections, the Department of Justice and  the Judicial Depart-
ment may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 2. (1) Section 1 of this 2017 Act becomes operative on June 30, 2018.
(2) The Department of Corrections, the Department of Justice and  the Judicial Depart-
ment may take any action before the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section
that is necessary to enable the departments, on and after the operative  date specified in
subsection (1) of this section, to exercise the duties, functions and  powers conferred on the
departments by section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1 (2),  chapter , Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill 5004), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2017, for central administration
and administrative  services, is increased by $275,000 for the purpose of funding upgrades to
the inmate trust accounting system.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law limiting  expenditures, the limi-
tation on expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter , Oregon Laws 2017  (En-
rolled House Bill 5004), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Corrections for central administration and administrative services, is increased by $500,000
for the purpose of funding upgrades to the inmate trust accounting system.
SECTION 5.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate July 3, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 844 (SB 844-B) Page 3